Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin School system videos. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to Cultural Connections: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 800,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) The grant recipient must use grant money to provide at least 320 public middle and high schools with videos explaining our school system to immigrant students and their parents at a basic level to accelerate integration, promote student success, and narrow the knowledge and achievement gaps for students through parental involvement. new text end new text begin (c) The grant recipient must provide videos translated into immigrant parents' first language and provide instructions for distribution to each secondary school receiving the videos. new text end new text begin (d) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end